New York, session 2025-2026, A6160.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The department of economic development shall designate the 2 equal rights heritage center located in the city of Auburn, county of 3 Cayuga, as the central New York welcome center, upon the completion of 4 any existing contracts for the operation of the central New York welcome 5 center existing upon the effective date of this act. The department of 6 economic development shall establish a contract with the city of Auburn, 7 county of Cayuga, for the operation of such new central New York welcome 8 center upon the expiration of any such existing contracts. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03395-01-5